North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Procedure for Exercise of Appraisal Rights.

§ 55-13-20.
Notice of appraisal rights.

If any corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, or where no approval of the action is required pursuant to G.S. 55-11-03(j), the meeting notice or, if applicable, the offer made pursuant to G.S. 55-11-03(j), shall state that the corporation has concluded that shareholders are, are not, or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this Article. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this Article shall accompany the meeting notice or offer sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

In a merger pursuant to

G.S. 55-11-04

or

G.S. 55-11-12

, the parent corporation shall notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. Notice required under this subsection shall be sent within 10 days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in

G.S. 55-13-22

.

If any corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to

G.S. 55-7-04

, then the following shall occur:

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available shall be given to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of each shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this Article.

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not, or may be available shall be delivered together with the notice to the applicable shareholders required by subsections (d) and (e) of

G.S. 55-7-04

, may include the materials described in

G.S. 55-13-22

, and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, shall be accompanied by a copy of this Article.

If any corporate action described in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

is proposed, or a merger pursuant to

G.S. 55-11-04

or

G.S. 55-11-12

is effected, then the notice or offer referred to in subsection (a) or (c) of this section, if the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, and the notice referred to in subsection (b) of this section, shall be accompanied by both of the following:

Annual financial statements as described in G.S. 55-16-20(a) of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised. The date of the financial statements shall not be more than 16 months before the date of the notice. If annual financial statements that meet the requirements of this subdivision are not reasonably available, then the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information and in any case shall provide a balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than 16 months before the date of the notice, an income statement for that year, and a cash flow statement for that year.

The latest interim financial statements of the corporation, if any.

The right to receive the information described in subsection (d) of this section may be waived in writing by a shareholder before or after the corporate action.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; c. 235; 1929, c. 269; 1939, c. 5; c. 279; 1943, c. 270; G.S., ss. 55-26, 55-165, 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2002-58, s. 2; 2011-347, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 26; 2021-106, s. 6(g).

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Before a vote is taken on a corporate action, the corporation is required by section 13.20(a) to notify record shareholders that a transaction is proposed and that the corporation has concluded either that appraisal rights are or are not available; alternatively, if the corporation is unsure about the availability of appraisal rights, it may state that appraisal rights may be available. Notice of appraisal rights is needed because many shareholders do not know what appraisal rights they may have or how to assert them. If the corporation has concluded appraisal rights are or may be available, the notice must be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

Section 13.20(b) provides that notice be given by the parent corporation within ten days after the effective date of a merger of its subsidiary under section 11.05. This notice may be combined with the notice required by section 13.22.

North Carolina Commentary

This section adds to the Model Act’s provisions the 10-day requirement in subsection (b) and the new subsection (c). A similar 10-day requirement is included in G.S. 55-13-22(b) and in section 13.22(b) of the Model Act. The new subsection (c) was adapted from former G.S. 55-113(f), except that the period within which the damage action may be brought was increased from one to three years, thus increasing the burden on the corporation to comply with the statute. The shareholder must bring the damage action “in his own name,” and not as a class or derivative action.

§ 55-13-21.
Notice of intent to demand payment and consequences of voting or consenting.

If a corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares must do the following:

Deliver to the corporation, before the vote is taken, written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated.

Not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of any class or series in favor of the proposed action.

If a corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

is to be approved by less than unanimous written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares must satisfy both of the following requirements:

The shareholder must deliver to the corporation, before the proposed action becomes effective, written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated, except that the written notice is not required if the notice required by G.S. 55-13-20(c) is given less than 25 days prior to the date the proposed action is effectuated.

The shareholder must not execute a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

(b1)

If a corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

does not require shareholder approval pursuant to

G.S. 55-11-03

(j), a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares must satisfy both of the following requirements:

(1)

The shareholder must deliver to the corporation, before the shares are purchased pursuant to the offer made consistent with subdivision (2) of subsection (j) of

G.S. 55-11-03

, written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated.

(2)

The shareholder must not tender, or cause or permit to be tendered, any shares of the class or series in response to the offer.

A shareholder who fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a), (b), or (b1) of this section is not entitled to payment under this Article.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 27.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.21 applies to all transactions requiring appraisal, except short-form mergers under section 11.05. In the latter case, shareholders of the subsidiary do not vote on the transaction but are nevertheless entitled to appraisal.

Section 13.21(a) requires the shareholder to give notice of an intent to demand payment before the vote on the corporate action is taken. This notice enables the corporation to determine how much of a cash payment may be required. It also serves to limit the number of persons to whom the corporation must give further notice during the remainder of the appraisal process.

In order for a shareholder to remain eligible to demand payment, section 13.21(a)(2) mandates that the shareholder must not vote (or, in the case of a beneficial shareholder, cause or permit to be voted) any shares of any class or series for which the shareholder is demanding appraisal in favor of the proposal.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is substantially the same as section 13.21 of the Model Act with minor clarifying changes.

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary 2018

Effective as of October 1, 2018, this section was amended to facilitate the determination of how much of a cash payment may be required by the exercise of appraisal rights upon closing a corporate action that is approved by shareholder written consent. The amendments provide that the shareholder must provide a notice of intent to demand an appraisal rights payment before the corporate action becomes effective provided notice of the corporate action was given to the shareholder at least 25 days before the effective time. The amendments also provide procedures for exercising appraisal rights to non-tendering shareholders in second-step mergers following a tender offer in which offeror gains control under G.S. 55-11-03(j).

§ 55-13-22.
Appraisal notice and form.

If a corporate action requiring appraisal rights under

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

becomes effective, the corporation must deliver a written appraisal notice and form required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of

G.S. 55-13-21

. In the case of a merger under

G.S. 55-11-04

or

G.S. 55-11-12

, the parent corporation must deliver a written appraisal notice and form to all record shareholders of the subsidiary who may be entitled to assert appraisal rights.

The appraisal notice must be sent no earlier than the date the corporate action specified in

G.S. 55-13-02(a)

became effective and no later than 10 days after that date. The appraisal notice must include the following:

A form that specifies the first date of any announcement to shareholders, made prior to the date the corporate action became effective, of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action. If such an announcement was made, the form shall require a shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before that date. The form shall require a shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify that the shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction.

Disclosure of the following:

Where the form must be sent and where certificates for certificated shares must be deposited, as well as the date by which those certificates must be deposited. The certificate deposit date must not be earlier than the date for receiving the required form under sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.

A date by which the corporation must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than 40 nor more than 60 days after the date the appraisal notice required under subsection (a) of this section and form are sent. The form shall also state that the shareholder shall have waived the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by the specified date.

The corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares.

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder so requesting, within 10 days after the date specified in sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision, the number of shareholders who return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them.

The date by which the notice to withdraw under

G.S. 55-13-23

must be received, which date must be within 20 days after the date specified in sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.

Be accompanied by a copy of this Article.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-485, s. 4; 2001-387, s. 27; 2002-58, s. 3; 2011-347, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 28.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

The purpose of section 13.22 is to require the corporation to provide shareholders with information and a form for perfecting appraisal rights. The content of this notice and form are spelled out in detail to ensure that they accomplish this purpose.

When an action is submitted to the vote of shareholders, the appraisal notice must be sent only to those persons who gave notice of their intention to demand appraisal under section 13.21 and did not vote (or permit or cause to be voted) such shares in favor of the proposed action. In a short-form merger under section 11.05, the notice must be sent to all persons who may be eligible for appraisal rights no earlier than the effective date of the merger and no later than ten days thereafter. In either case, the notice must be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

The notice must supply a form to be used by the person asserting appraisal rights in order to complete the exercise of those rights. Under section 13.22(b)(2)(ii), the notice must specify the date by which the shareholder’s executed form must be received by the corporation, which date must be at least 40 days but not more than 60 days after the appraisal notice is sent.

Under section 13.22(b)(2)(i), the notice must also specify where and when share certificates must be deposited; the time for deposit may not be set at a date earlier than the date for receiving the required form under section 13.22(b)(2)(ii).

Sections 13.22(b)(1) and (2)(i) require the corporation to specify in the form supplied for demanding payment where the form must be sent as well as the date of the first announcement of the terms of the proposed corporate action. This is the critical date for determining the rights of shareholder-transferees: persons who became shareholders prior to that date are entitled to full appraisal rights, while persons who became shareholders on or after that date are entitled only to the more limited rights provided by section 13.25. See the Official Comments to sections 13.23 and 13.25. The date set forth in the form should be the date the principal terms of the transaction were announced by the corporation to shareholders. This may be the day the terms were communicated directly to the shareholders, included in a public filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, published in a newspaper of general circulation that can be expected to reach the financial community, or any earlier date on which such terms were first announced by any other person or entity to such persons or sources. Any announcement to news media or to shareholders that relates to the proposed transaction but does not contain the principal terms of the transaction to be authorized at the shareholders’ meeting is not considered to be an announcement for the purposes of section 13.22.

Sections 13.22(b)(2)(iii) and (b)(2)(iv) require the corporation to state its estimate of the fair value of the shares and how shareholders may obtain the number of shareholders and number of shares demanding appraisal rights. The information required by sections 13.22(b)(2)(iii) and (b)(2)(iv) is intended to help shareholders assess whether they wish to demand payment or to withdraw their demand for appraisal, but the information under section 13.22(b)(2)(iv) is required to be sent only to those shareholders from whom the corporation has received a written request. If such request is received, the corporation must respond within ten days after forms are due pursuant to section 13.22(b)(2)(ii). Finally, section 13.22(b)(2)(v) requires the corporation to specify the date by which the shareholder’s notice to withdraw under section 13.23 must be received.

North Carolina Commentary

This section is substantially the same as section 13.22 of the Model Act with minor clarifying changes, except that the specified contents of the form required by subdivision (b)(3) were omitted in light of the changes in

G.S. 55-13-25

.

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary (2001)

Effective January 1, 2002, subsection (a) was amended in light of changes in

G.S. 55-7-04

to permit less than unanimous shareholder action without meeting for corporation other than public corporations and to clarify that a shareholder who consents to action without meeting is not entitled to payment for the shareholder’s shares under this Article.

§ 55-13-23.
Perfection of rights; right to withdraw.

A shareholder who receives notice pursuant to

G.S. 55-13-22

and who wishes to exercise appraisal rights must sign and return the form sent by the corporation and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit the shareholder’s certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the notice pursuant to

G.S. 55-13-22

(b)(2). In addition, if applicable, the shareholder must certify on the form whether the beneficial owner of such shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to G.S. 55-13-22(b)(1). If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the corporation may elect to treat the shareholder’s shares as after-acquired shares under

G.S. 55-13-27

. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder’s certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed forms, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder, unless the shareholder withdraws pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

A shareholder who has complied with subsection (a) of this section may nevertheless decline to exercise appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice pursuant to G.S. 55-13-22(b)(2)e. A shareholder who fails to so withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the corporation’s written consent.

A shareholder who does not sign and return the form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit that shareholder’s share certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described in G.S. 55-13-22(b) shall not be entitled to payment under this Article.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.23 permits shareholders to perfect their appraisal rights under subsection (a), subject to their right to withdraw under subsection (b). In the case of a transaction involving a vote by shareholders, returning the executed form and, in the case of certificated shares, depositing the shares are the shareholder’s confirmation of the shareholder’s intention expressed earlier under section 13.21(a) to pursue appraisal rights; in the case of a merger of a subsidiary under section 11.05, it is the shareholder’s first statement of this position.

The shareholder should include on the appraisal form a certification as to whether the date on which the beneficial shareholder acquired beneficial ownership of the shares was before (or on or after) the date the transaction was announced. See section 13.22(b)(1). This information permits the corporation to exercise its right under section 13.25 to defer payment of compensation for certain shares. The corporation may elect to proceed under section 13.25 with respect to those shareholders who fail to make the required certification.

Section 13.23(a) also requires persons with certificated shares who file the required form to deposit their share certificates as directed by the corporation in its appraisal notice. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder’s shares, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder unless the shareholder withdraws from the appraisal process pursuant to section 13.23(b).

With respect to certificated shares, this provision differs from many statutes in that the certificates are deposited for retention, rather than “submitted for notation.” This difference reflects the requirement in section 13.22(b)(2)(i) for deposit only after the corporate action became effective; in contrast, many state statutes require shareholders to send in their certificates in anticipation of the effectuation of the proposed corporate action.

Alternatively, under section 13.23(b), a shareholder may withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the corporation in writing by the deadline set forth in the appraisal notice. After that date, however, a shareholder who has complied with the requirements to execute and return the form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit the share certificates may not withdraw from the process without the corporation’s written consent.

Under section 13.23(c), a shareholder who fails to execute and return the form with respect to the shares of a class or series for which the shareholder is demanding appraisal or does not deposit that shareholder’s share certificates as required by section 13.23(a) loses all rights to pursue appraisal and obtain payment under this chapter. If a beneficial shareholder wishes to assert appraisal rights in place of the record shareholder, the beneficial shareholder must also comply with section 13.03(b).

North Carolina Commentary

This section makes minor changes from subsection 13.22(a) of the Model Act to conform it to the modifications made in

G.S. 55-13-25

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, rewrote the section catchline, which formerly read: “Duty to demand payment”; and rewrote the section.

§ 55-13-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; repealed by 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

§ 55-13-25.
Payment.

Except as provided in

G.S. 55-13-27

, within 30 days after the form required by G.S. 55-13-22(b) is due, the corporation shall pay in cash to the shareholders who complied with G.S. 55-13-23(a) the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of their shares, plus interest.

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be accompanied by the following:

The following financial information:

Annual financial statements as described in G.S. 55-16-20(a) of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised. The date of the financial statements shall not be more than 16 months before the date of payment. If annual financial statements that meet the requirements of this sub-subdivision are not reasonably available, the corporation shall provide reasonably equivalent financial information and in any case shall provide a balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than 16 months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, and a cash flow statement for that year.

The latest interim financial statements, if any.

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares. The estimate shall equal or exceed the corporation’s estimate given pursuant to G.S. 55-13-22(b)(2)c.

A statement that the shareholders described in subsection (a) of this section have the right to demand further payment under

G.S. 55-13-28

and that if a shareholder does not do so within the time period specified in

G.S. 55-13-28

, then the shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted payment in full satisfaction of the corporation’s obligations under this Article.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; c. 770, s. 69; 1997-202, s. 2; 2011-347, s. 1; 2021-106, s. 6(h).

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.24 is applicable both to shareholders who have complied with section 13.23(a), as well as to shareholders who are described in section 13.25(a) if the corporation so chooses. The corporation must, however, elect to treat all shareholders described in section 13.25(a) either under section 13.24 or under section 13.25; it may not elect to treat some shareholders from this group under section 13.24 but treat others under section 13.25. Considerations of simplicity and harmony may prompt the corporation to elect to treat all shareholders under section 13.24.

Section 13.24 changes the relative balance between the corporation and shareholders demanding appraisal by requiring the corporation to pay in cash within 30 days after the required form is due the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the stock plus interest. Section 13.24(b)(2) requires that estimate to at least equal the corporation’s estimate of fair value given pursuant to section 13.22(b)(2)(iii). Since under section 13.23(a) all rights as a shareholder are terminated with the deposit of that shareholder’s shares, the former shareholder should have immediate use of such money. A difference of opinion over the total amount to be paid should not delay payment of the amount that is undisputed. Thus, the corporation must pay its estimate of fair value, plus interest from the effective date of the corporate action, without waiting for the conclusion of the appraisal proceeding.

Since the former shareholder must decide whether or not to accept the payment in full satisfaction, the corporation must at this time furnish the former shareholder with the information specified in section 13.24(b), with a reminder of the former shareholder’s further rights and liabilities.

North Carolina Commentary

This section differs from the Model Act by requiring the corporation to send its offer of payment, rather than payment itself, to the dissenter upon completion of the transaction or (if the transaction did not need shareholder approval and has been completed) upon receipt of payment demand. Payment is made to the dissenter upon his acceptance of the corporation’s offer in writing. Payment is made to the nonaccepting dissenter at the commencement of the court proceeding under

G.S. 55-13-30

.

Subdivision (b)(1) was further modified to refer to a “statement of cash flows” instead of a “statement of changes in shareholders’ equity,” in accordance with the provisions of FASB-95.

§ 55-13-26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; repealed by 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011.

§ 55-13-27.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by

G.S. 55-13-25

from any shareholder who was required to but did not certify that beneficial ownership of all of the shareholder’s shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before the date set forth in the appraisal notice sent pursuant to G.S. 55-13-22(b)(1).

If the corporation elected to withhold payment under subsection (a) of this section, it must, within 30 days after the form required by G.S. 55-13-22(b) is due, notify all shareholders who are described in subsection (a) of this section of the following:

The information required by G.S. 55-13-25(b)(1).

The corporation’s estimate of fair value pursuant to G.S. 55-13-25(b)(2).

That they may accept the corporation’s estimate of fair value, plus interest, in full satisfaction of their demands or demand appraisal under

G.S. 55-13-28

.

That those shareholders who wish to accept such offer must so notify the corporation of their acceptance of the corporation’s offer within 30 days after receiving the offer.

That those shareholders who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under

G.S. 55-13-28

shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation’s offer.

Within 10 days after receiving the shareholder’s acceptance pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the corporation must pay in cash the amount it offered under subdivision (b)(2) of this section to each shareholder who agreed to accept the corporation’s offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder’s demand.

Within 40 days after sending the notice described in subsection (b) of this section, the corporation must pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under subdivision (b)(2) of this section to each shareholder described in subdivision (b)(5) of this section.

History.

2011-347, s. 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.25(a) gives the corporation the option to treat differently shares acquired on or after the date of public announcement of the proposed corporate action; this date is specified by the corporation in its appraisal notice under section 13.22(b)(1). At the corporation’s option, holders of shares acquired on or after this date, or shareholders who fail to certify otherwise under section 13.23(a), are not entitled to immediate payment under section 13.24. Instead, shareholders described in subsection (a) may receive only an offer of payment which is conditioned on their agreement to accept it in full satisfaction of their claim. If the right of unconditional immediate payment were granted as to all after-acquired shares, speculators and others might be tempted to buy shares merely for the purpose of demanding appraisal. Since the function of appraisal rights is to protect investors against unforeseen changes, there is no need to give equally favorable treatment to purchasers who knew or should have known about the proposed changes.

The date used as a cut-off for determining the application of this section is when “the principal terms” of the transaction are first announced to shareholders or to a newspaper of general circulation that can be expected to reach the financial community or included in a public filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The cut-off should not be set at an earlier date, such as when the first public statement that the corporate action was under consideration was made, because the goal of this section is to prevent use of appraisal rights as a speculative device after the terms of the transaction are announced. See the Official Comment to section 13.22.

Section 13.25(b) requires the corporation to furnish specified information to all shareholders described in subsection (a) and offer them the option of accepting the corporation’s estimate of fair value plus interest, in full satisfaction of their claims, provided that such shareholders so accept and notify the corporation within ten days of receiving this offer. Within ten days after receiving a shareholder’s acceptance, the corporation must pay that shareholder in cash the stated fair value plus interest.

A shareholder may accept the offered payment in full satisfaction of that shareholder’s claim; alternatively, a shareholder may reject the corporation’s offer and demand a judicial determination under section 13.26 and payment of the amount so determined at the termination of the proceeding. A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of section 13.26 shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation’s offer.

North Carolina Commentary

Section 13.27 of the Model Act has been omitted as unnecessary in light of

G.S. 55-13-25

.

§ 55-13-28.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A shareholder paid pursuant to

G.S. 55-13-25

who is dissatisfied with the amount of the payment must notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s estimate of the fair value of the shares and demand payment of that estimate plus interest (less any payment under

G.S. 55-13-25

). A shareholder offered payment under

G.S. 55-13-27

who is dissatisfied with that offer must reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value of the shares, plus interest.

A shareholder who fails to notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s demand to be paid the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value, plus interest, under subsection (a) of this section within 30 days after receiving the corporation’s payment or offer of payment under

G.S. 55-13-25

or

G.S. 55-13-27

, respectively, waives the right to demand payment under this section and shall be entitled only to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-202, s. 3; 2011-347, s. 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

A shareholder who is not content with the corporation’s remittance under section 13.24, or offer of remittance under section 13.25, and wishes to pursue appraisal rights further must state in writing the amount the shareholder is willing to accept. A shareholder whose demand is deemed arbitrary, unreasonable or not in good faith, however, runs the risk of being assessed litigation expenses under section 13.31. These provisions are designed to encourage settlement without a judicial proceeding.

A shareholder to whom the corporation has made payment (or who has been offered payment under section 13.25) must make a supplemental demand within 30 days after receipt of the payment or offer of payment in order to permit the corporation to make an early decision on initiating appraisal proceedings. A failure to make such demand causes the shareholder to relinquish under section 13.26(b) anything beyond the amount the corporation paid or offered to pay.

North Carolina Commentary

The Model Act was modified in this section to reflect the fact that under

G.S. 55-13-25

, a dissenter who has not accepted the corporation’s offer has not yet received payment. A dissenter who fails to notify the corporation of his demand under this section resumes the status of a nondissenting shareholder.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, substituted “with payment or offer” for “with corporation’s payment or failure to perform” in the section catchline; and rewrote the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 389.

§ 55-13-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.